Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1087.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 9024(m) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and subsection (k) is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 9024. Electric vehicle road user charge.* * *(k) Exceptions.--The following electric vehicles and plug-in hybrid electric vehicles shall not be required to pay the electric vehicle road user charge under this section:* * *(8) A motor vehicle registered to a person on active duty military service assigned and stationed outside of this Commonwealth for the period the person is stationed outside of this Commonwealth.123456789101112131415161718 * * *(m) Refunds.--A person may be entitled to a refund of the electric vehicle road user charge paid for a vehicle that would otherwise have been exempt under section 9004. A person entitled to a refund of the electric vehicle road use fee shall apply for an annual refund in a manner similar to the refund process used for liquid fuels, fuels and alternative fuels under section 9017. A person may be entitled to a refund of the electric vehicle road user charge paid for a vehicle that would otherwise be exempt under subsection (k)(8) for the period in which that person was qualified for an exemption under subsection (k)(8) on a form and in a manner as prescribed by the Department of Transportation.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1087PN1377 - 2 - 123456789101112131415